Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.250

Recordkeeping requirements.

Any person issued a license or permit under the provisions of this chapter may be required by the director to keep accurate records on a form prescribed by the director which may contain the following information:

(1) The delivery, movement or holding of any pesticide or device, including the quantity;

(2) The date of shipment and receipt;

(3) The name of consignor and consignee; and

(4) Any other information, necessary for the enforcement of this chapter, as prescribed by the director.

The director shall have access to such records at any reasonable time to copy or make copies of such records for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1989 c 380 s 22; 1971 ex.s. c 190 s 25.]